Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1226
Ambulance; transportation requirements.

No ambulance shall transport any patient upon any street, road, highway, airspace, or public way in the State of Nebraska unless such ambulance, when so transporting patients, is occupied by at least one licensed emergency care provider. Such requirement shall be met if any of the individuals providing the service is a licensed physician, registered nurse, or licensed physician assistant functioning within the scope of practice of his or her license.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5186;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 510;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 35.